Hawaii statutes.
[§346-66] Psychological services. When
the health care or rehabilitative services authorized under this chapter are
services which a psychologist is licensed to render under chapter 465, the
department shall not require referral, direction, or prescription of services
by another health care practitioner. [L 1987, c 290, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next